Utah statutes.
26-18-11.   Rural hospitals.

(1)  For purposes of this section "rural hospital" means a hospital located outside of a standard metropolitan statistical area, as designated by the United States Bureau of the Census.

(2)  For purposes of the Medicaid program and the Utah Medical Assistance Program, the Division of Health Care Financing may not discriminate among rural hospitals on the basis of size.

